Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 12 General Offenses

30-12-1.
Use of military forces outside state.

No military forces of this state other than the national guard (and the naval militia) shall be required to serve outside the boundaries of this state except:

Upon the request of the governor of another state, the governor of this state may, in his or her discretion, order any portion of, or all of, the forces of this state to assist the military or police forces of the other state who are actually engaged in defending the other state. These forces may be recalled by the governor at his or her discretion.

Any organization, unit, or detachment of state forces, upon the order of the officer in immediate command thereof, may continue in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies, or enemy forces beyond the borders of this state into another state until they are apprehended or captured by the organization, unit, or detachment, or until the military or police forces of the other state or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit, or to apprehend, or capture these persons; provided, the other state shall have given authority by law for the pursuit by the forces of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 213; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-1

.

30-12-2.
Surrender of person arrested in another state.

Any person described in §

30-12-1

who shall be apprehended or captured in another state by an organization, unit, or detachment of the forces of this state shall, without unnecessary delay, be surrendered to the military or police forces of the state in which the person is taken, or to the United States, but this surrender shall not constitute a waiver by this state of its right to extradite or prosecute this person for any crime committed in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 213; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-2

; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 8.

30-12-3.
Pursuit into this state by forces of another state.

Any military force or organization, or unit, or detachment thereof of another state that is in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies, or enemy forces may continue that pursuit into this state until the military or police forces of this state, or the forces of the United States, have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture these persons, and is hereby authorized to arrest or capture these persons within this state while in fresh pursuit. Any of the above described persons who shall be captured or arrested by the military forces of another state while in this state shall, without unnecessary delay, be surrendered to the military or police forces of this state to be dealt with according to law. This section shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be lawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 214; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 36.

30-12-4.
Entry into state by armed forces from outside.

No military force from another state, territory, district, or country shall be permitted to enter the state for the purpose of doing military duty therein, except as provided in §

30-12-3

, without the permission of the governor, unless this force is part of the Department of Defense or is acting under the authority of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 215; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-4

.

30-12-5.
Arrest of trespassers and persons interfering with functions of militia.

The commanding officer, upon any occasion of duty, may place in arrest, during the continuance thereof, any person who shall trespass upon a camp or parade ground, armory, arsenal, rifle range, or any other place devoted to or used for militia purposes; who shall in any way or manner interrupt, molest or disturb the orderly discharge of militia duty; or who shall disturb or prevent the passage of troops going to, or returning from, any duty. That person shall also be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 216; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-5

.

30-12-6.
Assault of assembled militia.

Any person who assaults, fires at, or throws any missile at, against, or upon any uniformed member or body of the militia, or other person lawfully aiding that member or body, when assembling or assembled for the purpose of performing any militia duty, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 217; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-6

.

30-12-7.
Unauthorized military organizations or parades — Revocation of authority.

No body of persons, other than the national guard, the independent chartered military organizations, the unorganized militia on active duty, the military and naval forces and air force of the United States, associations wholly composed of soldiers, sailors, marines, or air persons, honorably discharged from the service of the United States, veterans of the national guard or naval militia, the organization of the Order of the Sons of Veterans, and organizations now or hereafter authorized to do so by the express permission of the governor or otherwise by law, shall associate themselves together as a military company or organization, or parade in public with firearms in any city or town of this state.

No city or town shall raise or appropriate any money toward arming or equipping, uniforming, or in any other way supporting, sustaining, or providing drill rooms or armories for any body described in subsection (a). This section shall not be construed to prevent any organization, now authorized to do so by the express permission of the governor or otherwise, by law, from parading with firearms, nor to prevent drills or parades by the national guard of any other state. The governor may at any time revoke the permission granted by himself or herself or any previous governor to any organization or body of persons to associate themselves together as a military company or meet as a military company for drill with arms, or parade in public as a military company with arms. Any person violating any provision of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 218; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-7

.

30-12-8.
Misappropriation of military property.

Any person who shall secrete, sell, dispose of, offer for sale, purchase, retain after demand made by the adjutant general or a commissioned officer of the national guard, willfully damage, or in any manner pledge or pawn any arms, ammunition, uniforms, equipment, supplies, or other property issued by the United States, or this state, for the use of the militia shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 219; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-8

.

30-12-9.
Unlawful wearing of uniform.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person not an officer or enlisted person of the national guard to wear the duly prescribed uniform of the national guard, or any distinctive part of that uniform, or a uniform any part of which is similar to a distinctive part of the duly prescribed uniform of the national guard, except members of the Department of Defense of the United States and the national guard or naval militia of this or any other state, members of associations wholly composed of soldiers, sailors, or marines and air persons honorably discharged from the service of the United States, veterans of the national guard or naval militia, members of the Order of the Sons of Veterans, and such others as may be specially authorized so to do by the governor, or under the laws of the United States, or of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 220; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-9

.

30-12-10.
Discrimination because of military service.

No person shall discriminate against any officer or enlisted person of the military or naval forces of the United States or of this state because of his or her membership therein.

No person shall prohibit or refuse entrance to any officer or enlisted person of the military or naval forces of the United States or of this state into any public entertainment or place of amusement or common carrier because the officer or enlisted person is wearing the uniform of the organization to which he or she belongs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 221; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-10

.

30-12-11.
Trespass or injury to property.

Any person who willfully trespasses upon any camp or parade ground, armory, arsenal, rifle range, or property lawfully used by, or in connection with, the militia, or any part thereof; or injures any property situated thereon; or willfully violates thereon any regulations established to maintain order, preserve property, or prevent accidents upon that property; or removes, mutilates, or destroys any of that property, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 223; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-11

.

30-12-12.
Penalty — Surety for costs.

Any person found guilty of a misdemeanor as provided for in chapters 1 — 14 of this title shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or to confinement for not more than one year, or both. Any person making a complaint for the violation of the provisions of these chapters shall not be required to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 222; G.L. 1956, §

30-12-12

.